Tennessee, session 114, HB1709.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-58-103(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-9-609(a), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(a)
(1) To be licensed as a court reporter, an applicant shall submit proof of
the following:
(A) The applicant is a United States citizen or a qualified alien, as
defined in § 4-58-102; and
(B) The applicant passed the National Court Reporters
Association registered professional reporter examination, the National
Verbatim Reporters Association certified verbatim reporter examination,
or the American Association of Electronic Reporters and Transcribers
certified electronic reporter examination and certified electronic
transcriber examination.
(2) Applications for licensure must be signed and sworn by the applicants
and submitted on forms furnished by the commissioner.
HB1709
011322
- 1 -

(3) All applicants who are found qualified to engage in the practice of
court reporting pursuant to this part must be issued a license as a licensed court
reporter and an identifying number.
(4) The license is valid for two (2) years from the date of issuance.
(5) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a licensed court reporter is
not required to be a notary public to administer oaths to witnesses in the
performance of their professional duties as a court reporter.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 23, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The supreme court is encouraged to establish guidelines to limit a person's
eligibility for a license to practice law or engage in law business to a person who is a
United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-5-127, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(e) To be eligible for a professional license issued by the department, board,
commission, agency, or other governmental entity pursuant to this title, a person must
be a United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 42-2-210, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(d) Aeronautics Instructors License Requirement. To be licensed as an
aeronautics instructor pursuant to this section, a person must be a United States citizen
or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 43, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
- 2 - 011322

To be eligible for a professional license issued by the department pursuant to this
title, a person must be a United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-
102.
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-10-203, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
(b) To be eligible for a license pursuant to this section, a person must be a
United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-15-111, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(c) To be eligible for a certificate pursuant to this section, a person must be a
United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-16-201, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
(b) To be eligible for a license pursuant to this section, a person must be a
United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-17-104, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(c) To be eligible for a license pursuant to this section, a person must be a
United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 45-1-130, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(e) To be eligible for a professional license under this title, a person must be a
United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
- 3 - 011322

SECTION 12. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18-5504, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(d) To be eligible for registration under this chapter, a provider must be a United
States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 13. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18-5512, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
(b) Prior to a provider's license, certificate, or registration from another state
being accepted by the administrator, the administrator shall either:
(1) Confirm that the other state has verified that the provider is a United
States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102; or
(2) Verify that the provider is a United States citizen or a qualified alien,
as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 14. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18-5512, is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(4) The criteria in subsection (b) have been met.
SECTION 15. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18-5803, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(f) To be eligible for a license under this part, a person must be a United States
citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 16. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-26-804(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) Is a United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 17. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-26-1004, is amended by deleting
subdivision (3) and substituting:
- 4 - 011322

(3) Be a United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102; and
SECTION 18. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-101, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(h) To be eligible for an educator license pursuant to this section, a person must
be a United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 19. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-106, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(l) To be eligible for a permit or license endorsement exemption pursuant to this
section, a person must be a United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-
58-102.
SECTION 20. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-109, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(b) Prior to entering into a reciprocal agreement with a certifying or licensing
authority in another state, as described in subsection (a), the state board of education
shall either:
(1) Confirm that the other state has verified that the person is a United
States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102; or
(2) Verify that the person is a United States citizen or a qualified alien, as
defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 21. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 52-2-406, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(i) To be eligible for a license pursuant to this part, a person must be a United
States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 22. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-1-204, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
- 5 - 011322

(e) To be eligible for a license pursuant to this section, a person must be a
United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 23. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 53, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
To be eligible for a license or registration certificate pursuant to this chapter, a
person must be a United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 24. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-7-216, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(f) To be eligible for a license pursuant to this part, a person must be a United
States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 25. Chapter 463 of the Public Acts of 2025, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection in § 53-7-205 in Section 1:
(e) To be eligible for a license pursuant to this part, a person must be a United
States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 26. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-14-105(b), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(6) Provides proof that the applicant is a United States citizen or a qualified
alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 27. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-17-302, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(d) To be eligible for a license pursuant to this section, a person must be a
United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 28. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-6-103, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
- 6 - 011322

(b) To be eligible for a license pursuant to this section, a person must be a
United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 29. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 57, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
To be eligible for a professional license or permit under this chapter, a person
must be a United States citizen, a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102, or have a
valid J-1 or F-1 student visa, as verified by the alcoholic beverage commission.
SECTION 30. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 57, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
To be eligible for a permit under this chapter, a person must be a United States
citizen, a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102, or have a valid J-1 or F-1 student visa,
as verified by the alcoholic beverage commission.
SECTION 31. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 57, Chapter 7, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
To be eligible for a professional license under this chapter, a person must be a
United States citizen, a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102, or have a valid J-1 or F-
1 student visa, as verified by the alcoholic beverage commission.
SECTION 32. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 59, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
To be eligible for a license under this chapter, a person must be a United States
citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 33. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 59, Chapter 4, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
To be eligible for a certificate under this chapter, a person must be a United
States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
- 7 - 011322

SECTION 34. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 60, Chapter 4, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
To be eligible for a license under this chapter, a person must be a United States
citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 35. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-26-206(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 36. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-26-207(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 37. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-27-107(a), is amended by
deleting subdivision (2).
SECTION 38. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-106(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 39. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-117(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 40. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 62, Chapter 76, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding §§ 62-5-305, 62-5-307, and 62-5-312, to be eligible for a
certificate or professional license from a board, commission, agency, or other
governmental entity created pursuant to this title, a person must be a United States
citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 41. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-104(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(c) A license, examination, or certification must not be denied to a person for a
profession of the healing arts under this title if such person meets the eligibility
requirements in § 63-1-181.
- 8 - 011322

SECTION 42. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
63-1-181. Eligibility requirement.
(a)
(1) To be eligible for a license, certificate, permit, or authorization under
this title, a person must be a United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined
in § 4-58-102.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), a person may be eligible for a
license, certificate, permit, or authorization under this title if such person is
seeking to practice as a physician, pursuant to chapter 6 or 9 of this title, and
provides proof that the person has applied for a valid visa that would authorize
such person to work in the United States under federal law.
(b) If a board issues a license to an applicant who holds or possesses a valid
license to practice a healing art pursuant to this title in another state, then the board shall
either:
(1) Confirm that the other state has verified that the person meets the
requirements in subsection (a); or
(2) Verify that the person meets the requirements in subsection (a).
SECTION 43. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-5-110(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2) The applicant must be at least eighteen (18) years of age, of good moral
character and reputation, and be a citizen of Canada or meet the eligibility requirements
in § 63-1-181.
SECTION 44. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-207(a)(1), is amended by
deleting subdivision (E) and substituting:
- 9 - 011322

(E) Evidence of being a citizen of Canada or meeting the eligibility requirements
in § 63-1-181.
SECTION 45. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-207(a)(2), is amended by
deleting subdivision (E) and substituting:
(E) Evidence of being a citizen of Canada or meeting the eligibility requirements
in § 63-1-181.
SECTION 46. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-11-207(a)(3)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 47. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-11-207(b)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 48. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-11-207(c)(4)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 49. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-12-112(b)(4), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(4) Is a citizen of Canada or meets the eligibility requirements in § 63-1-181.
SECTION 50. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-14-103(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) A person is entitled to make application to the board for examination if the
person meets the following requirements:
(A) The person is of good moral character;
(B) The person is eighteen (18) years of age or older;
(C) The person has satisfactorily completed not less than two (2) years of
the prescribed course of a school for dispensing opticians recognized by the
board; and
- 10 - 011322

(D) The person has had practical training and experience of a grade and
character satisfactory to the board as an apprentice or student under the
supervision of a dispensing optician, optometrist, or ophthalmologist licensed by
the state for a period of not less than three (3) years or the equivalent amount of
time under the supervision of such licensed professionals of another state that
has dispensing opticianry licensure criteria at least as strict as this state.
SECTION 51. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-16-104(a)(1)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 52. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-20-102(1)(A), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 53. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-24-602, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(d) To be eligible for a license under this part, a person must be a United States
citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 54. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-104-102, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(h) To be eligible for a permit under this part, a person must be a United States
citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 55. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-135-103, is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(6) The applicant shall provide proof that the applicant is a United States citizen
or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 56. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-140-306, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
- 11 - 011322

(k) To be eligible for a license or certificate under this section, a person must be
a United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 57. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-904, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(d) To be eligible to be certified under this section, a person must be a United
States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 58. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-1-134, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(e) To be eligible for a professional license under this title, a person must be a
United States citizen or a qualified alien, as defined in § 4-58-102.
SECTION 59. The heading in this act is for reference purposes only and does not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the heading in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 60. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to licenses, permits, certificates, authorizations, or registrations applied for or
renewed on or after that date.
- 12 - 011322